Utah statutes.
34A-1-406.   Right of visitation.
(1)  The commissioner or the commissioner's designee may:
(a)  enter any place of employment for the purpose of:
(i)  collecting facts and statistics; or
(ii)  examining the provisions made for the health and safety of the employees
in the place of employment; and
(b)  bring to the attention of every employer any law, or any final order or
rule of the commission, and any failure on the part of the employer to comply
with the law, rule, or final order.
(2) An employer may not refuse to admit the commissioner or the commissioner's
designee to the employer's place of employment.
